South Dakota, session 2026, SB99.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF SOUTH DAKOTA:
Section 1. That § 10-12-42 be AMENDED:
10-12-42. For taxes payable in 2026 2027, and each year thereafter, the
maximum levy for the general fund of a school district is as follows:
(1) The maximum tax levy is five dollars and twenty-one and one-tenth cents per
thousand dollars of taxable valuation, subject to the limitations on agricultural property
as provided in subdivision (2) of this section and owner-occupied property as provided in
subdivision (3) of this section;
(2) The maximum tax levy on agricultural property for the school district is one
dollar and twelve and five-tenths cents per thousand dollars of taxable valuation. If the
district's levies are less than the maximum levies as stated in this section, the levies must
maintain the same proportion to each other as represented in the mathematical
relationship at the maximum levies; and
(3) The maximum tax levy for an owner-occupied single-family dwelling pursuant
to § 10-13-40 for the school district is two dollars and fifty-one and eight-tenths cents per
thousand dollars of taxable valuation. If the district's levies are less than the maximum
levies as stated in this section, the levies must maintain the same proportion to each other
as represented in the mathematical relationship at the maximum levies zero dollars and
zero cents per thousand dollars of taxable valuation.
All levies in this section must be imposed on valuations where the median level of
assessment represents eighty-five percent of market value as determined by the
Department of Revenue. These valuations must be used for all school funding purposes.
If the district has imposed an excess levy pursuant to § 10-12-43, the levies must
Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.

99C 2 99
maintain the same proportion to each other as represented in the mathematical
relationship at the maximum levies in this section. The school district may elect to tax at
less than the maximum amounts set forth in this section imposed pursuant to this section
for taxes payable in 2026.
Section 2. That § 10-45-1 be AMENDED:
10-45-1. Terms used in this chapter mean:
(1) "Agricultural purposes," the producing, raising, growing, or harvesting of food or
fiber upon agricultural land, including dairy products, livestock, and crops. The
services of custom harvesters, chemical applicators, fertilizer spreaders, hay
grinders, and cultivators are considered agricultural purposes. The harvesting of
timber on land within the state is considered an agricultural purpose;
(2) "Business," any activity engaged in by any person or caused to be engaged in by
such person with the object of gain, benefit, or advantage, either direct or indirect;
(3) "Candy," any preparation of sugar, honey, or other natural or artificial sweeteners
in combination with chocolate, fruits, nuts or other ingredients or flavorings in the
form of bars, drops, or pieces. The term, candy, does not include any preparation
containing flour and does not require refrigeration;
(4) "Delivery charges," charges by the retailer for preparation and delivery to a location
designated by the purchaser of tangible personal property, any product transferred
electronically, or services including transportation, shipping, postage, handling,
crating, and packing. The term does not include postage for direct mail;
(5) "Food" and "food ingredient," any substance, whether in liquid, concentrated, solid,
frozen, dried, or dehydrated form, that is sold for ingestion or chewing by humans
and is consumed for its taste or nutritional value. The term, food, does These terms
do not include alcoholic beverages, tobacco, or prepared food:
(a) Alcoholic beverages, as defined in § 35-1-1;
(b) Cannabis or cannabis products, as defined in § 34-20G-1;
(c) Cigarettes, as defined in § 10-50B-4;
(d) Prepared food; or
(e) Tobacco products, as defined in § 10-50-1;
(6) Repealed by SL 2007, ch 56, § 1.
(7) "Person," any individual, firm, copartnership, joint adventure, association, limited
liability company, corporation, municipal corporation, estate, trust, business trust,
Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.

99C 3 99
receiver, the State of South Dakota and its political subdivisions, or any group or
combination acting as a unit;
(8) "Prepared food," any food:
(a) Food sold in a heated state or heated by the seller; two
(b) Two or more food ingredients mixed or combined by the seller for sale as a
single item; or food
(c) Food sold with eating utensils provided by the seller, including plates,
knives, forks, spoons, glasses, cups, napkins, or straws. A, but a plate does
not include a container or packaging used to transport the food.
Prepared food does not include food that is only cut, repackaged, or pasteurized
by the seller, and eggs, fish, meat, poultry, and foods containing these raw animal
foods requiring cooking by the consumer as recommended by the Food and Drug
Administration in chapter 3, part 401.11 of its Food Code as of January 1, 2003,
so as to prevent food borne illnesses;
(8A) "Product transferred electronically," any product obtained by the purchaser by
means other than tangible storage media. A product transferred electronically does
not include any intangible such as a patent, stock, bond, goodwill, trademark,
franchise, or copyright.
(9) "Relief agency," the state, and county, municipality or district thereof, or any
agency engaged in actual relief work;
(10) "Retail sale" or "sale at retail," any sale, lease, or rental for any purpose other than
for resale, sublease, or subrent;
(11) "Retailer," any person engaged in the business of selling tangible goods, wares, or
merchandise at retail, or the furnishing of gas, electricity, water, and
communication service, and tickets or admissions to places of amusement and
athletic events as provided in this chapter, and the sale at retail of products
transferred electronically. The term also includes any person subject to the tax
imposed by §§ 10-45-4 and 10-45-5. The isolated or occasional sale of tangible
personal property or any product transferred electronically at retail by a person
who does not hold himself or herself out as engaging in the business of selling such
tangible personal property or products transferred electronically at retail does not
constitute such person a retailer;
(12) "Sale," any transfer, exchange, or barter, conditional or otherwise, in any manner
or by any means whatsoever, for a consideration;
Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.

99C 4 99
(13) "Soft drinks," any nonalcoholic beverages that contain natural or artificial
sweeteners. The term, soft drinks, does not include any beverage that contains
milk or milk products, soy, rice of similar milk substitutes, or greater than fifty
percent of vegetable or fruit juice by volume;
(14) "Tangible personal property," personal property that can be seen, weighed,
measured, felt, or touched, or that is in any other manner perceptible to the
senses. The term includes electricity, water, gas, steam, and prewritten computer
software.
Section 3. That § 10-45-2 be AMENDED:
10-45-2. There is hereby imposed a tax upon the privilege of engaging in business
as a retailer, a tax of four and two-tenths at the rate of six and two-tenths one-half percent
upon the gross receipts of all sales of tangible personal property consisting of goods,
wares, or merchandise, except as otherwise provided in this chapter, sold at retail in the
state to consumers or users.
Section 4. That § 10-45-5 be AMENDED:
10-45-5. There is imposed a tax, at the rate of four and two-tenths percent set
forth in § 10-45-2, upon the gross receipts of any person from engaging or continuing in
any of the following businesses or services in this state: abstracters
(1) Abstracters;
(2) accountantsAccountants;
(3) ancillaryAncillary services;
(4) architectsArchitects;
(5) barbersBarbers;
(6) beautyBeauty shops;
(7) billBill collection services;
(8) blacksmithBlacksmith shops;
(9) carCar washing;
(10) dryDry cleaning;
(11) dyeingDyeing;
(12) exterminatorsExterminators;
(13) garageGarage and service stations;
(14) garmentGarment alteration;
(15) cleaningCleaning and pressing;
Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.

99C 5 99
(16) janitorialJanitorial services and supplies;
(17) specialtySpecialty cleaners;
(18) laundryLaundry;
(19) linenLinen and towel supply;
(20) membershipMembership or entrance fees for the use of a facility or for the
right to purchase tangible personal property, any product transferred electronically, or
services;
(21) photographyPhotography;
(22) photoPhoto developing and enlarging;
(23) tireTire recapping;
(24) weldingWelding and all repair services, except repair services for farm
machinery, attachment units, and irrigation equipment used exclusively for agricultural
purposes;
(25) cableCable television; and
(26) rentalsRentals of tangible personal property, except leases of tangible
personal property between one telephone company and another telephone company,
motor vehicles as defined pursuant to § 32-5-1 leased under a single contract for more
than twenty-eight days, and mobile homes. However, the
The specific enumeration of businesses and professions made in this section does
not, in any way, limit the scope and effect of the provisions of § 10-45-4.
Section 5. That § 10-45-5.3 be AMENDED:
10-45-5.3. There is imposed, at the rate of four and two-tenths percent set forth
in § 10-45-2, an excise tax on the gross receipts of any person engaging in oil and gas
field services (, group no. 138), as enumerated in the Standard Industrial Classification
Manual, 1987, as prepared by the Statistical Policy Division of the Office of Management
and Budget, Office of the President.
Section 6. That § 10-45-6 be AMENDED:
10-45-6. There is hereby imposed a tax of four and two-tenths percent, at the
rate set forth in § 10-45-2, upon the gross receipts from sales, furnishing, or service of
gas, electricity, and water, including the gross receipts from such the sales by any
municipal corporation furnishing gas, and electricity, to the public in its proprietary
capacity, except as otherwise provided in this chapter, when sold at retail in the State of
South Dakota this state to consumers or users.
Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.

99C 6 99
Section 7. That § 10-45-6.1 be AMENDED:
10-45-6.1. Except as provided in § 10-45-6.2, there is hereby imposed a tax of
four and two-tenths percent, at the rate set forth in § 10-45-2, upon the gross receipts
from providing any intrastate, interstate, or international telecommunications service that
originates or terminates in this state and that is billed or charged to a service address in
this state, or that both originates and terminates in this state. However, the tax imposed
by this section does not apply to:
(1) Any eight hundred or eight hundred-type service, unless the service both originates
and terminates in this state;
(2) Any sale of a telecommunication service to a provider of telecommunication
services, including access service, for use in providing any telecommunication
service; or
(3) Any sale of interstate telecommunication service provided to a call center that has
been certified by the secretary of revenue to meet the criterion established in § 10-
45-6.3 and the call center has provided to the telecommunications service provider
an exemption certificate issued by the secretary indicating that it meets the
criterion.
If a call center uses an exemption certificate to purchase services not meeting the
criterion established in § 10-45-6.3, the call center is liable for the applicable tax, penalty,
and interest.
Section 8. That § 10-45-6.2 be AMENDED:
10-45-6.2. There is hereby imposed a tax of four and two-tenths percent, at the
rate set forth in § 10-45-2, upon the gross receipts of mobile telecommunications services,
as defined in 4 U.S.C. § 124(7) as of (January 1, 2002), that originate and terminate in
the same state and are billed to a customer with a place of primary use in this state or
are deemed to have originated or been received in this state and to be billed or charged
to a service address in this state if the customer's place of primary use is located in this
state regardless of where the service actually originates or terminates. Notwithstanding
any other provision of this chapter and for purposes of the tax imposed by this section,
the tax imposed upon mobile telecommunication services must be administered in
accordance with 4 U.S.C. §§ 116- to 126, as in effect on, inclusive, (July 28, 2000).
Section 9. That § 10-45-8 be AMENDED:
Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.

99C 7 99
10-45-8. Except as otherwise provided in this chapter, there is imposed a tax of
four and two-tenths percent, at the rate set forth in § 10-45-2, upon the gross receipts
from all sales of tickets or admissions to:
(1) Places of amusement;
(2) Athletic contests; or
(3) Events.
Section 10. That § 10-45-71 be AMENDED:
10-45-71. There is imposed a tax of four and two-tenths percent on, at the rate
set forth in § 10-45-2, upon the gross receipts from the transportation of passengers. The
tax imposed by this section applies to any transportation of passengers if the passenger
boards and exits the mode of transportation within this state.
Section 11. That a NEW SECTION be added to chapter 10-45:
The rate imposed by this chapter upon the gross receipts of all sales of food and
food ingredients, as defined by § 10-45-1, is zero percent.
Section 12. That § 10-46-1 be AMENDED:
10-46-1. Terms, as used in this chapter mean:
(1) "Business," any activity engaged in by any person or caused to be engaged in by
such person with the object of gain, benefit or advantage either direct or indirect;
(2) "Candy," any preparation of sugar, honey, or other natural or artificial sweeteners
in combination with chocolate, fruits, nuts or other ingredients or flavorings in the
form of bars, drops, or pieces. The term, candy, does not include any preparation
containing flour and does not require refrigeration;
(3) "Delivery charges," charges by the retailer for preparation and delivery to a location
designated by the purchaser of tangible personal property, any product transferred
electronically, or services including transportation, shipping, postage, handling,
crating, and packing. The term does not include postage for direct mail;
(4) "Fair market value," the price at which a willing seller and willing buyer will trade.
Fair market value shall be determined at the time of purchase. If a public
corporation is supplying tangible personal property or any product transferred
electronically that will be used in the performance of a contract, fair market value
Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.

99C 8 99
shall be determined pursuant to § 5-18B-7. This definition also applies to chapter
10-45;
(5) "Food" and "food ingredient," any substance, whether in liquid, concentrated, solid,
frozen, dried, or dehydrated form, that is sold for ingestion or chewing by humans
and is consumed for its taste or nutritional value. The term, food, does These terms
do not include alcoholic beverages, tobacco, or prepared food:
(a) Alcoholic beverages, as defined in § 35-1-1;
(b) Cannabis or cannabis products, as defined in § 43-20G-1;
(c) Cigarettes, as defined in § 10-50B-4;
(d) Prepared food; or
(e) Tobacco products, as defined in § 34-20G-1;
(6) "Included in the measure of tax," the tangible personal property, any product
transferred electronically, or the service was purchased from a retailer licensed
under chapter 10-45 and that retailer has included the tax in the amount received
from the sale;
(7) "In this state" or "in the state," within the exterior limits of the State of South
Dakota and includes all territory within such limits owned by or ceded to the United
States of America;
(8) "Prepared food," any food sold in a heated state or heated by the seller; two or
more food ingredients mixed or combined by the seller for sale as a single item; or
food sold with eating utensils provided by the seller, including plates, knives, forks,
spoons, glasses, cups, napkins, or straws. A plate does not include a container or
packaging used to transport the food.
Prepared food does not include food that is only cut, repackaged, or pasteurized
by the seller, and eggs, fish, meat, poultry, and foods containing these raw animal
foods requiring cooking by the consumer as recommended by the Food and Drug
Administration in chapter 3, part 401.11 of its Food Code as of January 1, 2003,
so as to prevent food borne illnesses;
(8A) "Product transferred electronically," any product obtained by the purchaser by
means other than tangible storage media. A product transferred electronically does
not include any intangible such as a patent, stock, bond, goodwill, trademark,
franchise, or copyright.
(9) "Purchase," any transfer, exchange, or barter, conditional or otherwise, in any
manner or by any means whatsoever, for a consideration. A transaction, whereby
Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.

99C 9 99
the possession of property is transferred but the seller retains the title as security
for the payment of the price, is a purchase;
(10) "Purchase price," shall have the same meaning as gross receipts defined in chapter
10-45;
(11) "Retailer," any person performing services in this state or engaged in the business
of selling tangible personal property or products transferred electronically for use,
storage or other consumption within the meaning of this chapter. However, if in
the opinion of the secretary of revenue, it is necessary for the efficient
administration of this chapter to regard any salesmen, representatives, truckers,
peddlers, or canvassers as agents of the dealers, distributors, supervisors,
employers, or persons under whom they operate or from whom they obtain the
tangible personal property or any product transferred electronically sold by them
irrespective of whether they are making sales on their own behalf or on behalf of
such dealers, distributors, supervisors, employers, or persons, the secretary of
revenue may so regard them and may regard the dealers, distributors, supervisors,
employers, or persons as retailers for purposes of this chapter;
(12) "Retailer maintaining a place of business in the state," any retailer having or
maintaining within this state, directly or by a subsidiary, an office, distribution
house, sales house, warehouse, or other place of business, or any agents operating
within the state under the authority of the retailer or its subsidiary, irrespective of
whether such place of business or agent is located here permanently or temporarily
or whether such retailer or subsidiary is admitted to do business within this state
pursuant to the laws of the State of South Dakota granting the rights of foreign
corporations to do business in this state;
(13) "Secretary," the secretary of the Department of Revenue or any duly authorized
and appointed assistant, deputies, or agents of the secretary charged with the
administration or enforcement of this chapter;
(14) "Soft drinks," any nonalcoholic beverages that contain natural or artificial
sweeteners. The term, soft drinks, does not include any beverage that contains
milk or milk products, soy, rice of similar milk substitutes, or greater than fifty
percent of vegetable or fruit juice by volume;
(15) "Storage," any keeping or retention in this state for use or other consumption in
the State of South Dakota for any purpose except sale in the regular course of
business;
Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.

99C 10 99
(16) "Tangible personal property," personal property that can be seen, weighed,
measured, felt, or touched, or that is in any other manner perceptible to the senses
if furnished or delivered to consumers or users within this state. The term includes
electricity, water, gas, steam, and prewritten computer software;
(17) "Use," the exercise of right or power over tangible personal property or any product
transferred electronically incidental to the ownership of that property, except that
it does not include the sale of that property in the regular course of business. Use
also includes the use of the types of services, the gross receipts from the sale of
which are to be included in the measure of the tax imposed by chapter 10-45, and
the delivery or causing delivery into this state of tangible personal property or any
product transferred electronically intended to advertise any product or service or
promote or facilitate any sale to South Dakota residents.
Section 13. That § 10-46-2.1 be AMENDED:
10-46-2.1. For the privilege of using services in South Dakota this state, except
those types of services exempted by § 10-46-17.3, there is imposed on the person using
the service an excise tax equal to four and two-tenths, at the rate of six and two-tenths
one-half percent of the value of the services at the time they are rendered. However, this
This tax may not be imposed on any service:
(1) Service rendered by a related corporation, as defined in subdivision 10-43-1(11),
for use by a financial institution, as defined in subdivision 10-43-1(4); or on any
service § 10-43-1; or
(2) Service rendered by a financial institution, as defined in subdivision 10-43-1(4)
§ 10-43-1, for use by a related corporation as defined in subdivision 10-43-1(11).
For the purposes of this section, the term, "related corporation," includes a means
a corporation associated with another as its parent or subsidiary, or in a brother-sister
relationship. The term includes a corporation, which together with the financial institution,
is part of a controlled group of corporations, as defined in 26 U.S.C. § 1563 as in effect
on (January 1, 1989), except that the eighty percent ownership requirements set forth in
26 U.S.C. § 563(a)(2)(A) § 1563(a) for a brother-sister controlled group are reduced to
fifty-one percent.
For the purpose of this chapter, services rendered by an employee for the use of
the employer are not taxable.
Section 14. That § 10-46-2.2 be AMENDED:
Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.

99C 11 99
10-46-2.2. An excise tax is imposed upon the privilege of the use of rented
tangible personal property and any product transferred electronically in this state, at the
rate of four and two-tenths percent of set forth in § 10-46-2.1, on the rental payments
upon the property.
Section 15. That § 10-46-48 be AMENDED:
10-46-48. All revenue arising under the operation of Except as otherwise
provided, revenue collected pursuant to this chapter shall immediately must be turned
over to the state treasurer and by him credited to deposited in the general fund.
The treasurer shall deposit in the local effort replacement fund, established in
section 25 29 of this Act, thirty-two and three-tenths percent of the taxes collected by the
secretary of the Department of Revenue pursuant to this chapter.
Section 16. That § 10-46-58 be AMENDED:
10-46-58. There is imposed a tax of four and two-tenths percent on, at the rate
set forth in § 10-46-2.1, upon the privilege of the use of any transportation of passengers.
The tax imposed by this section applies to any transportation of passengers if the
passenger boards and exits the mode of transportation within this state.
Section 17. That § 10-46-69 be AMENDED:
10-46-69. There is hereby imposed a tax of four and two-tenths percent, at the
rate set forth in § 10-46-2.1, upon the privilege of the use of mobile telecommunications
services, as defined in 4 U.S.C. § 124(7) as of (January 1, 2002), that originate and
terminate in the same state and are billed to a customer with a place of primary use in
this state. Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter and for purposes of the tax
imposed by this section, the tax imposed upon mobile telecommunication services must
be administered in accordance with 4 U.S.C. §§ 116-126, as in effect on (July 28, 2000).
Section 18. That § 10-46-69.1 be AMENDED:
10-46-69.1. Except as provided in § 10-46-69, there is hereby imposed a tax of
four and two-tenths percent, at the rate set forth in § 10-46-2.1, upon the privilege of the
use of any intrastate, interstate, or international telecommunications service that
originates or terminates in this state and that is billed or charged to a service address in
Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.

99C 12 99
this state, or that both originates and terminates in this state. However, the The tax
imposed by this section does not apply to:
(1) Any eight hundred or eight hundred type service unless the service both originates
and terminates in this state;
(2) Any sale of a telecommunication service to a provider of telecommunication
services, including access service, for use in providing any telecommunication
service; or
(3) Any sale of interstate telecommunication service provided to a call center that has
been certified by the secretary of revenue to meet the criterion established in § 10-
45-6.3 and the call center has provided to the telecommunications service provider
an exemption certificate issued by the secretary indicating that it meets the
criterion.
If a call center uses an exemption certificate to purchase services not meeting the
criterion established in § 10-45-6.3, the call center is liable for the applicable tax, penalty,
and interest.
Section 19. That § 10-46-69.2 be AMENDED:
10-46-69.2. There is hereby imposed a tax of four and two-tenths percent, at the
rate set forth in § 10-46-2.1, upon the privilege of the use of any ancillary services.
Section 20. That a NEW SECTION be added to chapter 10-46:
The rate of tax imposed by this chapter upon the use, storage, or consumption in
this state of food and food ingredients is zero percent.
Section 21. That § 10-46E-1 be AMENDED:
10-46E-1. There is hereby imposed an excise tax of four and two-tenths percent,
at the rate of six and two-tenths one-half percent, on the gross receipts from the sale,
resale, or lease of farm machinery, attachment units, and irrigation equipment used
exclusively for agricultural purposes. However, if If any trade-in or exchange of used farm
machinery, attachment units, and irrigation equipment is involved in the transaction, the
excise tax is only due and may only be collected on the cash difference.
Section 22. That § 10-46E-9 be AMENDED:
Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.

99C 13 99
10-46E-9. The Except as otherwise provided, revenue from the tax imposed by
this chapter shall must be deposited in the general fund.
The treasurer shall deposit in the local effort replacement fund, established in
section 25 29 of this Act, thirty-two and three-tenths percent of the taxes collected by the
secretary of the Department of Revenue pursuant to this chapter.
Section 23. That § 10-58-1 be AMENDED:
10-58-1. There is imposed upon owners and operators a special amusement
excise tax of four and two-tenths six and two-tenths one-half percent of the gross receipts
from the sale or the operation of any mechanical or electronic amusement device. The tax
imposed by this section is in lieu of the tax imposed pursuant to chapter 10-45.
Section 24. That § 10-58-5 be AMENDED:
10-58-5. The Except as otherwise provided, the tax generated by this chapter
must be deposited in the general fund.
The treasurer shall deposit in the local effort replacement fund, established in
section 25 29 of this Act, thirty-two and three-tenths percent of the taxes collected by the
secretary of the Department of Revenue pursuant to this chapter.
Section 25. That § 13-13-72 be AMENDED:
13-13-72. It is the policy of the Legislature that the appropriation for state aid to
education increase on an annual basis increases annually by the percentage increase in
local need on an aggregate statewide basis so that the relative proportion of local need
paid by local effort and state aid shall remain constant. For school fiscal years 2017 to
2022, inclusive, the proportion of local need paid by local effort and state aid shall be
adjusted annually to maintain the proportion between state aid and local property taxes
and to reflect adjustments in local effort due to the implementation of the other revenue
base amount as defined in § 13-13-10.1.
Section 26. That § 13-13-72.1 be AMENDED:
13-13-72.1. Any adjustments in the levies specified in § 10-12-42 made pursuant
to §§ 13-13-71 and § 13-13-72 shall must be based on maintaining the relationship
between statewide local effort as a percentage of statewide local need in the fiscal year
succeeding the fiscal year in which the adjustment is made. For school fiscal years 2017
Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.

99C 14 99
to 2022, inclusive, the proportion of local need paid by local effort and state aid shall be
adjusted annually to reflect adjustments in local effort due to the implementation of the
other revenue base amount as defined in § 13-13-10.1. However, if If the levies specified
in § 10-12-42 are not adjusted to maintain this relationship, the target teacher salary as
defined in § 13-13-10.1 shall must be reduced to maintain the relationship between
statewide local effort as a percentage of statewide local need.
Section 27. That § 13-13-78 be AMENDED:
13-13-78. Terms used in § 13-13-79 mean:
(1) "Sparse school district," a school district that meets each of the following criteria:
(a) Has a fall enrollment per square mile of 0.50 or less;
(b) Has a fall enrollment of five hundred or less;
(c) Has an area of four hundred square miles or more;
(d) Has at least fifteen miles between its secondary attendance center or
centers and that of an adjoining district; and
(e) Operates a secondary attendance center; and
(f) Levies ad valorem taxes at the maximum rates allowed pursuant to § 10-
12-42 or more;
(2) "Sparsity fall enrollment," for sparse school districts with a fall enrollment as
defined in § 13-13-10.1 of less than eighty-three or greater than two hundred
thirty-two, and is calculated as follows:
(a) Divide the fall enrollment as defined in § 13-13-10.1 by the area of the
school district in square miles;
(b) Multiply the quotient obtained in subsection (a) times negative 0.125;
(c) Add 0.0625 to the product obtained in subsection (b); and
(d) Multiply the sum obtained in subsection (c) times the fall enrollment;
(3) "Sparsity adjusted fall enrollment," for sparse school districts with a fall enrollment
as defined in § 13-13-10.1 of at least eighty-three, but no more than two hundred
thirty-two, subtract the fall enrollment from two hundred thirty-two.
Section 28. That § 13-13-92 be AMENDED:
13-13-92. The state general fund savings obtained through the state aid to
education formula from the difference between the school general fund levy for agriculture
property for taxes payable in 2018 pursuant to §§ 13-13-71, 13-13-72, and 13-13-72.1,
Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.

99C 15 99
and the agriculture property levy adopted by legislative action for taxes payable in 2018,
are in place until July 1, 2040.
Section 29. That a NEW SECTION be added to chapter 13-13:
There is created in the state treasury the local effort replacement fund. The
treasurer shall deposit in the fund thirty-two and three-tenths percent of the taxes
collected pursuant to:
(1) Chapter 10-45;
(2) Chapter 10-46;
(3) Chapter 10-46E; and
(4) Chapter 10-58; and
(5) § 32-5B-20.
The Department of Education shall administer the fund. The purpose of the fund is
to supplement property tax local effort for school district general funds and special
education funds with state revenue. Interest on moneys credited to the fund must remain
in the fund. Expenditures from the fund must be budgeted through the general
appropriation bill.
Section 30. That § 13-37-16 be AMENDED:
13-37-16. For taxes payable in 2026 2027, and each year thereafter, the school
board shall may levy no more than one dollar and forty-six and two-tenths zero dollars
and zero cents per thousand dollars of taxable valuation, as a special levy in addition to
all other levies authorized by law for the amount so determined to be necessary, and the
levy must be spread against all of the taxable property of the district. The proceeds derived
from the levy constitute a school district special education fund of the district for the
payment of costs for the special education of all children in need of special education or
special education and related services who reside within the district pursuant to the
provisions of §§ 13-37-8.4 to 13-37-8.10, inclusive. The levy in this section is based on
valuations where the median level of assessment represents eighty-five percent of market
value as determined by the Department of Revenue. The total amount of taxes that would
be generated at the levy pursuant to this section is considered local effort. Money in the
special education fund may be expended for the purchase or lease of any assistive
technology that is directly related to special education and specified in a student's
individualized education plan. This section does not apply to real property improvements.
Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.

99C 16 99
Section 31. That § 13-37-35.1 be AMENDED:
13-37-35.1. Terms used in chapter 13-37 mean:
(1) "Level one disability," a mild disability;
(2) "Level two disability," cognitive disability or emotional disorder;
(3) "Level three disability," hearing impairment, deafness, visual impairment, deaf-
blindness, orthopedic impairment, or traumatic brain injury;
(4) "Level four disability," autism;
(5) "Level five disability," multiple disabilities;
(5A) "Level six disability," prolonged assistance;
(6) "Index factor," is the annual percentage change in the consumer price index for
urban wage earners and clerical workers as computed by the Bureau of Labor
Statistics of the United States Department of Labor for the year before the year
immediately preceding the year of adjustment, or three percent, whichever is less;
(7) "Local effort," must be an amount calculated for taxes payable in 2026 2027 and
thereafter using a the maximum special education levy of one dollar and twenty-
six and two-tenths cents per one thousand dollars of valuation set forth in § 13-
37-16;
(8) "Allocation for a student with a level one disability," for the school fiscal year
beginning July 1, 2025, is $7,650.45. For each school year thereafter, the allocation
for a student with a level one disability must be the previous fiscal year's allocation
for the child increased by the index factor;
(9) "Allocation for a student with a level two disability," for the school fiscal year
beginning July 1, 2025, is $16,759.91. For each school year thereafter, the
allocation for a student with a level two disability must be the previous fiscal year's
allocation for the child increased by the index factor;
(10) "Allocation for a student with a level three disability," for the school fiscal year
beginning July 1, 2025, is $23,139.68. For each school year thereafter, the
allocation for a student with a level three disability must be the previous fiscal
year's allocation for the child increased by the index factor;
(11) "Allocation for a student with a level four disability," for the school fiscal year
beginning July 1, 2025, is $18,053.89. For each school year thereafter, the
allocation for a student with a level four disability must be the previous fiscal year's
allocation for the child increased by the index factor;
(12) "Allocation for a student with a level five disability," for the school fiscal year
beginning July 1, 2025, is $37,039.28. For each school year thereafter, the
Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.

99C 17 99
allocation for a student with a level five disability must be the previous fiscal year's
allocation for the child increased by the index factor;
(12A) "Allocation for a student with a level six disability," for the school fiscal year
beginning July 1, 2025, is $11,838.15. For each school year thereafter, the
allocation for a student with a level six disability must be the previous fiscal year's
allocation for the child increased by the index factor;
(13) "Child count," is the number of students in need of special education or special
education and related services according to criteria set forth in rules promulgated
pursuant to §§ 13-37-1.1 and 13-37-46 submitted to the Department of Education;
(14) "Fall enrollment," the number of kindergarten-through-twelfth-grade students
enrolled in all schools operated by the school district on the last Friday of
September of the previous school year minus the number of students for whom
the district receives tuition, except any nonresident student who is in the care and
custody of a state agency and is attending a public school and any student for
whom tuition is being paid pursuant to § 13-28-42.1, plus the number of students
for whom the district pays tuition;
(15) "Nonpublic school," a sectarian organization or entity accredited by the secretary of
education for the purpose of instructing children of compulsory school age. This
definition excludes any school that receives a majority of its revenues from public
funds;
(16) "Nonpublic fall enrollment," the number of children under age eighteen, who are
approved for alternative instruction pursuant to § 13-27-3 on the last Friday of
September of the previous school year plus:
(a) For nonpublic schools located within the boundaries of a public school
district with a fall enrollment of six hundred or more on the last Friday of
September of the previous school year, the number of kindergarten-
through-twelfth-grade students enrolled on the last Friday of September of
the previous regular school year in all nonpublic schools located within the
boundaries of the public school district;
(b) For nonpublic schools located within the boundaries of a public school
district with a fall enrollment of less than six hundred on the last Friday of
September of the previous school year, the number of resident
kindergarten-through-twelfth-grade students enrolled on the last Friday of
September of the previous school year in all nonpublic schools located
within this state;
Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.

99C 18 99
(17) "Special education fall enrollment," fall enrollment plus nonpublic fall enrollment;
(18) "Local need," an amount to be determined as follows:
(a) Multiply the special education fall enrollment by 0.1062 and multiply the
result by the allocation for a student with a level one disability;
(b) Multiply the number of students having a level two disability as reported on
the child count for the previous school fiscal year by the allocation for a
student with a level two disability;
(c) Multiply the number of students having a level three disability as reported
on the child count for the previous school fiscal year by the allocation for a
student with a level three disability;
(d) Multiply the number of students having a level four disability as reported on
the child count for the previous school fiscal year by the allocation for a
student with a level four disability;
(e) Multiply the number of students having a level five disability as reported on
the child count for the previous school fiscal year by the allocation for a
student with a level five disability;
(f) Multiply the number of students having a level six disability as reported on
the child count for the previous school fiscal year by the allocation for a
student with a level six disability;
(g) When calculating local need at the statewide level, include the amount set
aside for extraordinary expenses defined in § 13-37-40;
(h) When calculating local need at the statewide level, include the amount set
aside for the South Dakota School for the Blind and Visually Impaired; and
(i) Sum the results of subdivisions (18)(a) to (h), inclusive; and
(19) "Effort factor," the school district's special education tax levy in dollars per thousand
divided by $1.262. The maximum effort factor is 1.0 zero and zero-tenths.
Section 32. That § 32-5B-20 be AMENDED:
32-5B-20. There is hereby imposed a tax of four and two-tenths, at the rate of six and two-
tenths percent, upon the gross receipts of any person renting a rental vehicle as defined in
§ 32-5B-19. This tax applies to all vehicles registered in accordance with § 32-5-6, 32-5-8.1,
or 32-5-9. Any rental vehicle not licensed in accordance with § 32-5-6, 32-5-8.1, or 32-5-9
is subject to the motor vehicle excise tax in § 32-5B-1.
Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.

99C 19 99
The tax imposed by this section is in addition to any tax levied pursuant to chapter 10-45 or
10-46 upon the rental of a rental vehicle. The provisions of chapter 10-45 apply to the
administration and enforcement of the tax imposed by this section. The tax imposed by this
section is in lieu of the tax levied by § 32-5B-1 on the sales of such motor vehicles. A violation
of this section is a Class 1 misdemeanor.
Section 33. That § 32-5B-25 be AMENDED:
32-5B-25. All Except as otherwise provided, all excise taxes collected on the purchase of an
off-road vehicle as provided by § 32-5B-1 shall must be deposited in the state general fund.
The treasurer shall deposit in the local effort replacement fund, established in section 25 of
this Act, thirty-two and three-tenths percent of the taxes collected by the secretary of the
Department of Revenue pursuant to § 32-5B-20.
Section 32. That § 13-13-71 be REPEALED.
If local effort increases on a statewide aggregate basis by a greater percentage
than local need on a statewide aggregate basis from any one year to the next, for the
following year each of the levies specified in subdivision 13-13-10.1(13) shall be reduced
proportionally so that the percentage increase in local effort on a statewide aggregate
basis equals the percentage increase in need on a statewide aggregate basis.
Section 33. That § 13-37-16.2 be REPEALED.
If local effort increases on a statewide aggregate basis by a greater percentage
than local need on a statewide aggregate basis from any one year to the next, for the
following year, the levy specified in subdivision 13-37-35.1(7) shall be reduced
proportionally so that the percentage increase in local effort on a statewide aggregate
basis equals the percentage increase in need on a statewide aggregate basis.
Section 34. That § 13-37-16.3 be REPEALED.
Any adjustments in the levy specified in subdivision 13-37-35.1(7) made pursuant
to § 13-37-16.2 shall be based on maintaining the relationship between statewide local
effort as a percentage of statewide local need in the fiscal year succeeding the fiscal year
in which the adjustment is made. However, for fiscal year 2014, and each year thereafter,
if the levy specified in subdivision 13-37-35.1(7) is not adjusted to maintain this
Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.

99C 20 99
relationship, the funding allocation for each disability level as defined in § 13-37-35.1 shall
be reduced proportionally to maintain the relationship between statewide local effort as a
percentage of statewide local need.
Section 35. That 2023 Session Laws, chapter 32, § 19 be REPEALED:
Section 36. The amendments to the Code sections in sections 1 to 17, inclusive,
of this Act are repealed on June 30, 2027, and those Code sections will revert in word and
substance to that which existed immediately prior to the effective date of this Act.
Section 37. Sections 2 to 20 24, inclusive, and sections 25, 28, and section 29 of this Act
are effective beginning July January 1, 2027.
Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.